Utah statutes.
78B-5-206.   Mileage allowance for judgment debtor required to appear.

A judgment debtor legally required to appear before a district court or a master to answer concerning the debtor's property is entitled, on a sufficient showing of need, to mileage of 15 cents per mile for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in going only, to be paid by the judgment creditor at whose instance the judgment debtor was required to appear.  The judgment creditor is not required to make any payment for such mileage until the judgment debtor has actually appeared before the court or master.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

